Arkansas, session 2025, HB1602.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 23-92-503, concerning definitions used
under the Arkansas Pharmacy Benefits Manager Licensure Act, is amended to add
additional subdivisions to read as follows:
(16)(A) "Clean pharmacy claim" means a pharmacy claim that does
not have a defect, including without limitation a lack of any required
substantiating documentation or particular circumstance requiring special
treatment that may prevent timely payment of the pharmacy claim.
(B) "Clean pharmacy claim" includes an electronic pharmacy
claim that successfully processes in real time with an approval of drug,
*ANS124*
04-07-2025 11:12:01 ANS124

As Engrossed: H3/13/25 S4/7/25 HB1602
dosing, prescriber, or patient eligibility upon an electronic adjudication of
a pharmacy claim with the displayed paid amount from the pharmacy benefits
manager and the patient copay.
(C) "Clean pharmacy claim" does not include a successfully
adjudicated pharmacy claim that the pharmacy or pharmacist obtained by fraud
or a clerical error or misrepresentation of the pharmacy claim elements;
(17)(A) "Pharmacy claims bank identification number" means a
six-digit number or an eight-digit number from the National Council for
Prescription Drug Programs Processor ID Number bank identification number
that is utilized and shared by a pharmacy benefits manager to electronically
process a pharmacy claim.
(B) "Pharmacy claims bank identification number" may be
known as RXBIN or NCPDP Processor BIN;
(18)(A) "Pharmacy claims group number" means a unique set of
numbers and letters that are used by a pharmacy benefits manager to identify
a specific employer, plan sponsor, insurance provider, or plan type that a
patient is enrolled in to cover and reimburse a pharmacy or a pharmacist for
pharmacist services.
(B) "Pharmacy claims group number" may be known as an
RxGroup number or a prescription group number;
(19)(A) "Pharmacy claims processor control number" means a
secondary identifier that is alphanumerical and clarifies the pharmacy claim
to a specific network or plan type that a pharmacy benefits manager may use
in processing a pharmacy claim for pharmacist services.
(B) "Pharmacy claims processor control number" may be
known as PCN or RxPCN; and
(20) "Unique combination for pharmacy claims" means a pharmacy
claims bank identification number, pharmacy claims group number, pharmacy
claims processor control number, or any combination of a pharmacy claims bank
identification number, pharmacy claims group number, and pharmacy claims
processor control number that is used by a pharmacy benefits manager to
process a pharmacy claim.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 23-92-504 is amended to read as follows:
23-92-504. License to do business — Application — Fees — Rules.
(a)(1) A person or organization shall not establish or operate as a
04-07-2025 11:12:01 ANS124

As Engrossed: H3/13/25 S4/7/25 HB1602
pharmacy benefits manager in Arkansas for health benefit plans without
obtaining a license from the Insurance Commissioner under this subchapter.
(2) The commissioner shall prescribe the application for a
license to operate in Arkansas as a pharmacy benefits manager and may charge
application fees and renewal fees as established by rule.
(b) The commissioner shall issue rules establishing the licensing,
fees, application, financial standards, penalties, compliance and enforcement
requirements, and reporting requirements of pharmacy benefits managers under
this subchapter.
(c)(1) An initial application fee for a license as a pharmacy benefits
manager is twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) per pharmacy benefits manager
licensed under this subchapter.
(2)(A) A renewal application fee for a license as a pharmacy
benefits manager is twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) per pharmacy benefits
manager licensed under this subchapter.
(B) A renewal application and a renewal application fee
are required annually.
(C) The commissioner may reduce the initial application
fee under subdivision (c)(1) of this section or renewal application fee under
subdivision (c)(2) of this section for a pharmacy benefits manager if the
initial application fee or renewal application fee would constitute a
financial hardship that would prevent a pharmacy benefits manager from doing
business in this state or competing in the marketplace considering the
limited number of Arkansas patients impacted or the limited type of pharmacy
benefits manager services offered.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 23-92-509(a)(2), concerning the rules under
the Arkansas Pharmacy Benefits Manager Licensure Act, is amended to read as
follows:
(2) Rules that the commissioner may adopt under this subchapter
include without limitation rules relating to:
(A) Licensing;
(B) Application fees;
(C) Financial solvency requirements;
(D)(C) Pharmacy benefits manager network adequacy;
(E)(D) Prohibited market conduct practices;
04-07-2025 11:12:01 ANS124

As Engrossed: H3/13/25 S4/7/25 HB1602
(F)(E) Data reporting requirements under § 4-88-803;
(G)(F) Compliance and enforcement requirements under § 17-
92-507 concerning Maximum Allowable Cost Lists;
(H)(G) Rebates;
(I)(H) Compensation; and
(J)(I) Lists of health benefit plans administered by a
pharmacy benefits manager in this state.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code Title 23, Chapter 92, Subchapter 5, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
23-92-512. Pharmacy claims — Pharmacy claims bank identification
number, pharmacy claims group number, and pharmacy claims processor control
number — Reporting.
(a) A pharmacy benefits manager may differentiate different health
benefit plans, networks, or benefit packages with the use of a unique number
or other form of identification.
(b) At the time of renewal of a pharmacy benefits manager license, a
pharmacy benefits manager shall report to the Insurance Commissioner:
(1) Each pharmacy claims bank identification number, pharmacy
claims group number, and pharmacy claims processor control number that is
used by the pharmacy benefits manager;
(2) Each unique combination for pharmacy claims;
(3) Each unique combination for pharmacy claims by the estimated
number of covered lives in each combination by:
(A) Less than five hundred (500);
(B) Five hundred (500) to five thousand (5,000);
(C) Five thousand (5,000) to twenty-five thousand
(25,000);
(D) Twenty-five thousand (25,000) to one hundred thousand
(100,000); and
(E) Greater than one hundred thousand (100,000); and
(4) Each unique combination for pharmacy claims by plan type and
network that apply to:
(A) An employer-sponsored plan;
(B) A fully-insured plan;
(C) A self-funded plan;
04-07-2025 11:12:01 ANS124

As Engrossed: H3/13/25 S4/7/25 HB1602
(D) A plan or program that is funded by a state
appropriation to furnish, cover the cost of, or otherwise provide for
pharmacist services;
(E) A plan or program that is funded by the United States
Government or covers a federal employee, including without limitation Tricare
and Medicare Part D;
(F) A plan that is provided to municipal or county
employees;
(G) A plan that is provided to the Division of Arkansas
State Police;
(H) A plan that is provided to an employee of a public
two-year or four-year institution of higher education, including a community
college or technical collect;
(I) A plan provided under the Medicaid provider-led
organized care system;
(J) A plan provided by the Arkansas Health and Opportunity
for Me Program established by the Arkansas Health and Opportunity for Me Act
of 2021, § 23-61-1001 et seq.; or
(K) Any other plan types identified by the commissioner by
rule.
(c)(1) A pharmacy claims bank identification number may:
(A) Identify a specific pharmacy benefits manager, a
specific employer, or a sponsor of a plan;
(B) Be connected to a nationwide pharmacy benefits manager
database used to transmit and electronically process a pharmacy claim for a
pharmacist or a pharmacy for pharmacist services; and
(C)(i) Be used if the pharmacy benefits manager does not
use or issue a pharmacy benefit card with a magnetic stripe.
(ii) A pharmacy benefits manager that uses or issues
a pharmacy benefit card with a magnetic stripe may use the current
recommended International Organization for Standardization and the
International Electrotechnical Commission issuer identifier number for
electronically processing a pharmacy claim.
(2) The pharmacy claims bank identification number may be a
mandatory routing number to be used in electronic pharmacy claims submitted
through the National Council for Prescription Drug Programs billing
04-07-2025 11:12:01 ANS124

As Engrossed: H3/13/25 S4/7/25 HB1602
standards.
(d)(1) A pharmacy claims group number may be used to process a
pharmacy claim in addition to a pharmacy claims bank identification number.
(2) A pharmacy claims group number is not required for
submission of a clean pharmacy claim unless the pharmacy benefits manager
requires the pharmacy claims group number in order to identify a network or
group of covered patients that require this information for submission of a
clean pharmacy claim.
(e)(1) A pharmacy claims processor control number may be used by a
pharmacy benefits manager with an identifier that is unique to the pharmacy
benefits manager's business needs.
(2) A pharmacy claims processor control number is not required
for submission of a clean pharmacy claim unless the pharmacy benefits manager
requires the pharmacy claims processor control number in order to identify a
network or group of covered patients that require this information for
submission of a clean pharmacy claim.
(f)(1) Except as provided in subdivision (f)(2) of this section, the
information or data acquired during an examination under this section is:
(A) Considered nonproprietary and confidential under § 23-
61-107(a)(4) and § 23-61-207; and
(B) Not subject to the Freedom of Information Act of 1967,
§ 25-19-101 et seq.
(2) Information and data reported under this section shall not
be subject to subdivision (f)(1) of this section if the information and data
is available or shared by the commissioner:
(A) In a password-protected online database; or
(B) On request of:
(i) An Arkansas-licensed pharmacist or Arkansas-
licensed pharmacy; or
(ii) The contracted pharmacy services administrative
organization of the Arkansas-licensed pharmacist or Arkansas-licensed
pharmacy.

/s/L. Johnson


04-07-2025 11:12:01 ANS124